Utah statutes.
11-14-204.   Challenges to voter qualifications.

(1)  Any person's qualifications to vote at a bond election may be challenged according to the procedures and requirements of Sections 20A-3-105.5 and 20A-3-202.

(2)  A bond election may not be invalidated on the grounds that ineligible voters voted unless:

(a)  it is shown by clear and convincing evidence that ineligible voters voted in sufficient numbers to change the result of the bond election; and

(b)  the complaint is filed before the expiration of the time period permitted for contests in Subsection 20A-4-403(3).

(3)  The votes cast by the voters shall be accepted as having been legally cast for purposes of determining the outcome of the election, unless the court in a bond election contest finds otherwise.

